Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 2. Teachers’ Defined Benefit Retirement Plan.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 4, ch. 52, SLA 2014 requires the Alaska Retirement Management Board to “reinitialize the amortization of the past service liability” of the defined benefit retirement plan under this article “for a term beginning July 1, 2014, and ending June 30, 2039”.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 20, SLA 2007 (SB 123), proposing needed corrections and clarifications of statutes enacted as part of the 2005 legislation establishing defined contributions retirement plans and making related amendments to defined benefit retirement plans, see 2007 Senate Journal 567 — 570.

Sec. 14.25.009.
Applicability of AS 14.25.009 — 14.25.220.

The provisions of AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

apply only to members first hired before July 1, 2006.

History.

(§ 3 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 14.25.010.
Retirement plan established; federal qualification requirements.

A joint-contributory retirement plan for teachers of the state is created.

The retirement plan established by AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

is intended to qualify under 26 U.S.C. 401(a) and 414(d) (Internal Revenue Code) as a qualified retirement plan established and maintained by the state for its employees, for the employees of school districts and regional educational attendance areas in the state, and for the employees of other employers whose participation is authorized by AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

and who participate in this plan.

An amendment to AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

does not provide a person with a vested right to a benefit if the Internal Revenue Service determines that the amendment will result in disqualification of the plan under the Internal Revenue Code.

History.

(§ 1 ch 145 SLA 1955; am § 1 ch 89 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 59 SLA 2002; am § 2 ch 92 SLA 2004; am § 4 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 14.25.012.
Purpose and effective date.

[Repealed, § 132 ch 9 FSSLA 2005.]

The plan created in AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

became effective as of July 1, 1955, at which time contributions by the participating employers and members began.

Employees first hired after June 30, 2006, are not eligible to participate in the plan established in AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 13 SLA 1980; am §§ 5, 6, 132 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Secs. 14.25.015 — 14.25.037.
Administrator; Powers of the administrator; Regulations; Duties of the administrator; Teachers’ Retirement Board; Hearings. [Repealed, § 132 ch 9 FSSLA 2005.]

Sec. 14.25.040.
Membership; credited service.

Unless a teacher or member participates in a university retirement program under AS

14.40.661

—

14.40.799

or has elected under AS

14.25.540

to participate in the plan established in AS

14.25.310

—

14.25.590

, a teacher or member contracting for service with a participating employer is subject to AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

.

A state legislator who was an active member of this plan under other sections of AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

within the 12 months immediately preceding election to office may elect to be an active member of this plan for as long as the state legislator serves continuously as a state legislator subject to the requirements of (c) of this section, if, within 90 days after taking the oath of office,

the state legislator directs the employer in writing to

pay into this plan the employer contributions required for a member under AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

; and

deduct from the state legislator’s salary and pay into this plan

the employee contributions required for a member under AS 14.25.009 — 14.25.220; and

an amount equal to the difference between the total employer and state contributions required for a member under AS 14.25.009 — 14.25.220 and the employer contributions which would be required under the public employees’ retirement system (AS 39.35) if the legislator were covered under that system; and

notice is given the administrator in writing.

A state legislator is not entitled to elect membership under (b) of this section if the state legislator is covered for the same period of service under the public employees’ retirement system (AS 39.35). An election of membership under (b) of this section is retroactive to the date the state legislator took the oath of office. A state legislator may not receive membership credit under (b) of this section for legislative service performed before the legislative session during which the state legislator elected membership under (b) of this section. In order to continue in membership service under (b) of this section, the state legislator must earn at least 0.3 years of membership service under other sections of AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

during each five-year period. A state legislator may not receive membership credit under AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

for legislative service on or after the date the legislator commits a criminal offense from which a pension forfeiture under AS

37.10.310

results.

A person who is employed at least half-time in the plan during the same period that the person is employed at least half-time in a position in the public employees’ retirement plan under AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

shall receive credited service under each plan for half-time employment. However, the amount of credited service a person receives under the public employees’ retirement plan during a school year may not exceed the amount necessary, when added to the amount of credited service earned during the school year under the plan, to equal one year of credited service. A person who was employed at least half-time in a position in the public employees’ retirement plan under AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

in the same period that the person was employed at least half-time in a position in this plan may claim credited service in both plans for employment before May 31, 1989. To obtain this credited service, the person shall claim the service and verify the period of half-time employment. When eligibility for half-time service credit has been established, an indebtedness shall be determined to the retirement plan in which the person did not participate. The amount of the indebtedness is the full actuarial cost of providing benefits for the credited service claimed. Interest as prescribed by regulation accrues on that indebtedness beginning on the later of July 1, 1989, or the date on which the member is first eligible to claim the service. Any outstanding indebtedness existing at the time the person retires will require an actuarial adjustment to the benefits payable based on that service.

A teacher who is assaulted while on the job, who files for benefits under AS 23.30, and who, as a result of a physical injury from the assault, is placed on leave without pay, whether or not the teacher is receiving benefits under AS 23.30 for the injury, is entitled to accrue credited service while the teacher, because of the injury, is on leave-without-pay status or is receiving workers’ compensation benefits under AS 23.30. Entitlement to earn credited service under this subsection ends when the teacher is eligible to receive benefits under AS

14.25.110(a)

or

14.25.130(a)

.

History.

(§ 5 ch 145 SLA 1955; am § 1 ch 86 SLA 1963; am § 1 ch 151 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 85 SLA 1971; am § 1 ch 66 SLA 1973; am § 1 ch 169 SLA 1976; am § 1 ch 82 SLA 1979; am § 1 ch 58 SLA 1989; am § 1 ch 104 SLA 1989; am § 1 ch 52 SLA 2000; am §§ 2, 3 ch 57 SLA 2001; am § 4 ch 58 SLA 2001; am §§ 7 — 9 ch 9 FSSLA 2005; am § 3 ch 47 SLA 2007)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, in this section “AS

14.25.009

-

14.25.220

” was substituted for “this chapter” and “plan” was substituted for “system”.

Sec. 14.25.043.
Reemployment of retired members.

Except as provided in (f) of this section, if a retired member again becomes an active member, benefit payments may not be made during the period of reemployment. During the period of reemployment, deductions from the member’s salary will be made in accordance with AS

14.25.050

.

[Repealed, § 12 ch 57 SLA 2001 as amended by § 6 ch 15 SLA 2003 and § 10 ch 50 SLA 2005.]

Except as provided in (f) of this section, upon subsequent retirement, the retired member is entitled to receive an additional benefit based on the credited service and the average base salary during the period of reemployment in accordance with AS

14.25.110

. If the initial benefit payments to which the retired member is eligible have been actuarially reduced because the member retired early under AS

14.25.110(b)

, the member shall also receive an incremental benefit based on the amount of the actuarial reduction imposed by AS

14.25.110(j)

on the first benefit and the length of time that the employee was reemployed and not receiving retirement benefits. The amount of the incremental benefit is equal to the difference between the normal retirement benefit to which the member would have been entitled had the member taken a normal retirement and the early retirement benefit that the member has been receiving based on the member’s initial period of employment multiplied by the total number of months that the member did not receive retirement benefits because of reemployment and that amount actuarially adjusted to be paid over the expected lifetime of the member.

A member who retired under AS

14.25.110(a)

and participated in a retirement incentive program under ch. 26, SLA 1986; ch. 89, SLA 1989; ch. 65, SLA 1996; ch. 4, FSSLA 1996; or ch. 92, SLA 1997, who is subsequently reemployed as a commissioner may become an active member without losing the incentive credit provided under the applicable retirement incentive plan and is not subject to any related reemployment indebtedness.

[Repealed, § 6 ch 15 SLA 2003 as amended by § 10 ch 50 SLA 2005.]

If a member who retired under AS

14.25.110(a)

is reemployed by a school district under AS

14.20.136

,

the member does not become an active member;

the member shall continue to receive retirement benefits from the plan as though the member were not reemployed by the school district;

deductions from the member’s salary may not be made under AS

14.25.050

; and

the member may not receive credited service in the plan during the period of reemployment.

Notwithstanding (f) of this section, a member who is retired under AS

14.25.110(a)

and reemployed by a school district under AS

14.20.136

is eligible to receive the group health plan coverage provided to active members employed by that school district.

History.

(§ 4 ch 13 SLA 1980; am § 6 ch 68 SLA 2000; am §§ 4, 5, 12 ch 57 SLA 2001; am § 6 ch 58 SLA 2001; am §§ 2, 3, 6 ch 15 SLA 2003; am §§ 3 — 5, 10 ch 50 SLA 2005; am §§ 2 — 4 ch 81 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

For provision applicable to a retired teacher who was rehired and made an election under AS

14.25.043(b)

or (e) before November 3, 2004, see § 14(a) and (c), ch. 50, SLA 2005, in the 2005 Temporary and Special Acts.
For provision applicable to a retired teacher who was rehired and made an election under AS

14.25.043(b)

or (e) on or after November 3, 2004, see § 14(b) and (c), ch. 50, SLA 2005, in the Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision providing that the 2018 changes to this section apply “to contracts made on or after November 8, 2018”, see sec. 6, ch. 81, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For benefits under the defined benefits plan of the teachers’ retirement system, see 2 AAC 36, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2001 amendment by §§ 5, 12, and 15, ch. 57, SLA 2001, as amended by § 6, ch. 15, SLA 2003, §§ 10 and 17, ch. 50, SLA 2005, and §§ 3, 19, and 21, ch. 50, SLA 2005, effective July 1, 2009, in (a), deleted the end of the first sentence, which read, “unless the teacher makes an election under (b) or (e) of this section”, and in the third sentence, following “During the period of reemployment,” deleted “the member is subject to AS

14.25.050

, and”; and repealed subsections (b) and (e). Sections 7, 9, and 13, ch. 58, SLA 2001, which also repealed or amended provisions of this section in the same manner effective July 1, 2005, were repealed by §§ 13 and 18, ch. 50, SLA 2005.

The 2003 amendment, effective July 31, 2003, inserted “or (e)” in the first sentence in subsection (a) and added subsections (d) and (e).

The 2005 amendment, effective July 1, 2005, added the fourth through sixth sentences in subsection (b) and added the third through fifth sentences in subsection (e).

The 2005 amendment, effective July 1, 2009, in subsection (a) deleted “unless the teacher makes an election under (b) or (e) of this section” from the end of the first sentence and “the member is subject to AS

14.25.050

, and” preceding “deductions” in the last sentence.

The 2018 amendment, effective November 8, 2018, in (a), added “Except as provided in (f) of this section,” and made a related change, at the beginning of the first sentence, deleted the former second sentence, which read, “The retirement benefit must be suspended for the entire school year if the teacher is reemployed as an active teacher for a period equivalent to a year of service.”; in (c), added “Except as provided in (f) of this section,” and made a related change; added (f) and (g).

Sec. 14.25.045.
Participation by National Education Association employees. [Repealed, § 116(a) ch 20 SLA 2007.]

Sec. 14.25.047.
Participation by Special Education Service Agency employees.

An employee of the Special Education Service Agency may participate in the plan under AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

if

the employee possesses or is eligible to possess a teacher certificate under AS

14.20.020

; and

the employee pays all retroactive contributions required to be made under AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 112 SLA 1986)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1992, “system” was substituted for “retirement fund” to correct an error of omission in ch. 106, SLA 1988.

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, in this section “AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

” was substituted for “this chapter” and “plan” was substituted for “system”.

Sec. 14.25.048.
Teachers of Alaska Native language and culture.

Except as provided in (d) of this section, an employee employed by a participating employer on or after June 5, 1988, shall participate in the plan under AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

if the employee

teaches Alaska Native language or culture in a permanent full-time or permanent part-time position;

learned about the subject to be taught by living in the culture or using the language in daily life; and

is qualified to teach the subject to elementary or secondary students as required by regulations adopted by the Department of Education and Early Development.

An employee or former employee may receive credit for retroactive membership service for employment before June 5, 1988 if the employee or former employee met the requirements listed in (a) of this section at the time of the employment. To receive credit for the retroactive membership service, the employee or former employee shall claim the service and pay the retroactive contributions required under AS

14.25.061

. However, an employee or former employee may not receive retroactive credit under this subsection if the employee received credited service under AS 39.35 for the employment.

An employee or former employee who received credit under AS 39.35 for service that qualifies under (a) of this section may elect to transfer those periods of employment to the plan. To receive credit for retroactive membership service under this subsection, the employee or former employee shall claim the service and pay the retroactive contributions required under AS

14.25.061

.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, an employee employed as a teacher of Alaska Native language and culture and participating in the Public Employees’ Retirement System under AS 39.35 on the day before June 5, 1988 shall remain a member under AS 39.35 unless the employee elects to become a member of the Teachers’ Retirement System on or before September 3, 1988.

History.

(§ 4 ch 106 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in (a) of this section, “Department of Education” was changed to “Department of Education and Early Development” in accordance with § 89, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, SLA 2005, and, consistent with AS

14.25.009

, to correct a manifest error, in (a) of this section, “AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

” was substituted for “this chapter” and in (a) and (c) of this section “system” was substituted for “plan”.

Sec. 14.25.050.
Contributions by members.

Except as provided in (c) of this section, beginning January 1, 1991, each member shall contribute to the plan an amount equal to 8.65 percent of the member’s base salary accrued from July 1 to the following June 30. The employer shall deduct the contribution from the member’s salary at the end of each payroll period, and the contribution shall be credited by the plan to the member contribution account. The contributions shall be deducted from employee compensation before the computation of applicable federal taxes and shall be treated as employer contributions under 26 U.S.C. 414(h)(2). A member may not have the option of making the payroll deduction directly in cash instead of having the contribution picked up by the employer.

Each teacher is entitled to receive credit for unrefunded contributions paid into the retirement fund of 1945.

The employer of a teacher who, because of a physical injury caused by an on-the-job assault, is on unpaid leave of absence or is receiving benefits under AS 23.30 shall pay the teacher’s contributions required by this section while the teacher is on unpaid leave or receiving the workers’ compensation benefits.

A teacher who is placed on leave of absence without pay because the teacher is unable to work due to an on-the-job injury or occupational illness for which the teacher is receiving benefits under AS 23.30 and for which the teacher is not entitled to credited service under AS

14.25.040(e)

may elect to receive credited service for the time on leave of absence without pay status. When a teacher elects to receive credited service under this subsection, an indebtedness is established. The amount of the indebtedness is equal to the contributions that the teacher would have made if the teacher had been working. Interest as prescribed by regulation accrues on the indebtedness beginning on the date that the teacher returns to work or terminates employment. If there is an outstanding indebtedness at the time the teacher is appointed to retirement, benefits shall be actuarially adjusted.

History.

(§ 6 ch 145 SLA 1955; am § 4 ch 89 SLA 1960; am § 3 ch 78 SLA 1962; am § 1 ch 84 SLA 1969; am § 1 ch 138 SLA 1970; am § 1 ch 128 SLA 1977; am § 5 ch 106 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 97 SLA 1990; am §§ 2, 3 ch 52 SLA 2000; am § 3 ch 59 SLA 2002; am § 3 ch 92 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

Section 5, ch. 106, SLA 1988 amended (b) of this section to substitute “retirement system of 1945” for “retirement fund of 1945.”
The amendment was erroneous and inconsistent with other references in this chapter to the fund.
That amendment is not, therefore, shown in the text of the subsection.

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “plan” was substituted for “system” in this section.

Administrative Code. —

For benefits under the defined benefits plan of the teachers’ retirement system, see 2 AAC 36, art. 3.

Opinions of attorney general. —

PERS and TRS contribution rates may be increased for individuals who became members of the systems before the effective date of the rate increases, if the increases are accompanied by comparable enhancements to benefits.
April 20, 2005 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 14.25.055.
Supplemental contributions by teachers.

If a teacher first joined the plan before July 1, 1982, and is married or has a minor child and wishes to make a spouse or minor child eligible for a spouse’s pension or a survivor’s allowance, the teacher may elect to make a supplemental contribution of an additional one percent of the teacher’s base salary within 90 days of the teacher’s entry into participation in the plan, or within 90 days of marriage, or within 90 days of the birth or adoption of a child dependent upon the teacher.
Once an election is made under this section, supplemental contributions must be made whenever contributions are required under AS

14.25.050

unless the teacher executes a written waiver with the administrator.
The execution of a waiver relinquishes all rights and benefits previously accrued under AS

14.25.162

and

14.25.164

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 151 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 45 SLA 1967; am § 2 ch 84 SLA 1969; am § 2 ch 138 SLA 1970; am § 2 ch 66 SLA 1973; am § 2 ch 128 SLA 1977; am § 5 ch 13 SLA 1980; am § 4 ch 137 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “plan” was substituted for “system” in this section.

Administrative Code. —

For benefits under the defined benefits plan of the teachers’ retirement system, see 2 AAC 36, art. 3.

Sec. 14.25.060.
Arrearage indebtedness.

If a member first joined the plan before July 1, 1990, and has military service or Alaska Bureau of Indian Affairs (BIA) service, or if a member joined the plan before July 1, 1978, and has creditable outside service, the member may claim this service. If the member claims the service, the member is indebted to the plan as follows:

at the time of first becoming a member of the plan, the arrearage indebtedness is seven percent of the base salary multiplied by the total number of years of creditable outside, military, and Alaska BIA service; the administrator shall add compound interest at the rate prescribed by regulation to the arrearage indebtedness beginning July 1, 1963, or at the time the member first becomes eligible to claim the service, whichever is later, to the date of payment or the date of retirement, whichever occurs first;

if a member terminates from the plan and is subsequently reemployed as a member, the arrearage indebtedness to the plan for outside, military, or Alaska BIA service accumulated in the interim is seven percent of the base salary upon reentering membership service, multiplied by the number of years of interim outside, military, and Alaska BIA service; compound interest at the rate prescribed by regulation shall be added to the arrearage indebtedness beginning July 1, 1963, or the date of reemployment as a member, whichever is later, to the date of payment or the date of retirement, whichever occurs first.

If a member joins the plan on or after July 1, 1978, and has creditable outside service, the member may claim this service. If claimed, the member is indebted to the plan as follows:

The arrearage indebtedness is the full actuarial cost of providing benefits for the service being claimed. Compound interest at the rate prescribed by regulation shall be added to the arrearage indebtedness beginning the date the actuarial cost is established to the date of payment or the date of retirement, whichever occurs first.

If a member terminates from the plan and is subsequently reemployed as a member, the arrearage indebtedness for outside service during the interim is the full actuarial cost of providing benefits for the interim service being claimed. Compound interest at the rate prescribed by regulation shall be added to the arrearage indebtedness beginning the date the actuarial cost is established to the date of payment or the date of retirement, whichever occurs first.

The total military service claimed may not exceed five years. The combined total of outside and military service may not exceed 10 years, except that, if entry into the armed forces is immediately preceded by membership service and within one year after discharge is continued by membership service, that service may not be counted for purposes of determining the applicability of the 10-year limitation on the combined total of outside and military service.

If a member first joined the plan on or after July 1, 1990, and has military service or Alaska BIA service, the member’s indebtedness shall be determined under (a) of this section except that the percentage multiplier is 8.65 percent.

History.

(§ 7 ch 145 SLA 1955; am § 3 ch 142 SLA 1957; am § 5 ch 89 SLA 1960; am § 2 ch 86 SLA 1963; am § 11 ch 70 SLA 1964; am §§ 3, 4 ch 151 SLA 1966; am § 2 ch 76 SLA 1968; am §§ 3, 4 ch 138 SLA 1970; am § 3 ch 66 SLA 1973; am § 3 ch 128 SLA 1977; am § 14 ch 136 SLA 1978; am §§ 6, 7 ch 13 SLA 1980; am §§ 5, 75 ch 137 SLA 1982; am § 1 ch 82 SLA 1986; am §§ 6, 7 ch 106 SLA 1988; am §§ 2, 3 ch 97 SLA 1990; am § 4 ch 92 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “plan” was substituted for “system” in this section.

Cross references. —

For conversion of claimed BIA contract school service to BIA service, see § 2, ch. 44, SLA 1992.

Opinions of attorney general. —

In computing the amount of contributions for arrearages, teaching service in Alaska with the Bureau of Indian Affairs, a federal agency, is not “creditable membership service” such as will excuse the payment of arrearages for service prior to June 30, 1955, for participation in the teachers’ retirement plan. 1960 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 11.

Bureau of Indian Affairs teaching service should be treated as “outside service” for the purposes of computing “arrearages” and “creditable service” under provisions of the Teachers’ Retirement Act. 1960 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 11.

Regulations promulgated by the territorial or State Board of Education governing salaries are not germane to calculations of arrearage forgiveness or creditable service under the Teachers’ Retirement System. 1960 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 11.

Sec. 14.25.061.
Retroactive indebtedness.

A member who was not subject to the provisions of AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

, but who becomes subject to them because of a legislative change, may elect to receive credit for retroactive membership service by contributing to the plan an amount equal to the contributions the member would have made had the member been subject to the provisions of AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

for those years of retroactive service after June 30, 1955. Retroactive contributions are not required for retroactive membership service before July 1, 1955. Compound interest at the rate prescribed by regulation shall be added to the retroactive indebtedness from July 1, 1966, or the time of first becoming eligible under AS 14.25.009 — 14.25.220, whichever is later, to the date of payment or the date of retirement, whichever occurs first.

If retroactive indebtedness contributions have been made for retroactive service before July 1, 1955, the member is entitled to a refund of those retroactive membership indebtedness contributions.

[Repealed, § 133 ch 9 FSSLA 2005.]

History.

(§ 4 ch 128 SLA 1977; am §§ 8, 9 ch 13 SLA 1980; am § 8 ch 106 SLA 1988; am § 133 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, in this section “AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

” was substituted for “this chapter” and “plan” was substituted for “system”.

Sec. 14.25.062.
Reinstatement indebtedness. [Repealed, § 133, ch 9 FSSLA 2005.]

Sec. 14.25.063.
Payment of indebtedness.

In AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

, a member does not have to be reemployed under this plan in order to make indebtedness payments. However, except as provided in (d) of this section, a former member must be reemployed under this plan in order to make indebtedness payments. Payments apply first to accrued interest and then to principal.

Any outstanding indebtedness that exists at the time a member is appointed to retirement will necessitate an actuarial adjustment to the benefits payable based on the member’s corresponding service.

If, as a result of service credit claimed for which there is a corresponding indebtedness existing at retirement, the member’s retirement benefit is actuarially reduced and the resulting benefit is less than it would have been if the service credit had not been claimed, the retirement benefit shall be equal to the amount it would have been had the service credit never been claimed.

A former member who received a total refund of the member’s contribution account balance because of a levy under AS

09.38.065

or a federal tax levy may make indebtedness payments under this section.

History.

(§ 11 ch 13 SLA 1980; am §§ 6, 7 ch 137 SLA 1982; am §§ 1, 2 ch 89 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, in this section “AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

” was substituted for “this chapter” and “plan” was substituted for “system”.

Sec. 14.25.065.
Transmittal of contributions; claims against funds of an employer.

All contributions deducted in accordance with AS

14.25.050

and

14.25.055

shall be transmitted to the plan for deposit in the retirement fund no later than 15 days following the close of the payroll period, with the final contributions due for any school year transmitted no later than July 15.

The contributions of employers under AS

14.25.070

must be transmitted to the plan for deposit in the retirement fund and the Alaska retiree health care trust at the close of each pay period. If the contributions are not submitted within the prescribed time limit, interest must be assessed on the outstanding contributions at one and one-half times the most recent actuarially determined rate of earnings for the plan from the date that contributions were originally due. Amounts due from an employer and interest as prescribed in this section may be claimed by the administrator from any agency of the state or political subdivision that has in its possession funds of the employer or that is authorized to disburse funds to the employer that are not restricted by statute or appropriation to a specific purpose. The amount claimed shall be certified by the administrator as sufficient to pay the contributions and interest due from the employer. The amount claimed shall be submitted to the administrator for deposit in the retirement fund and the Alaska retiree health care trust.

History.

(§ 3 ch 84 SLA 1969; am § 4 ch 66 SLA 1973; am § 12 ch 13 SLA 1980; am § 10 ch 106 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 20 SLA 2007)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in (b) of this section, “Department of Education” was changed to “Department of Education and Early Development” in accordance with § 89, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, in this section “plan” was substituted for “system”.

Sec. 14.25.070.
Contributions by employers.

Each employer shall contribute to the system every payroll period an amount calculated by applying a rate of 12.56 percent to the total of all base salaries paid by the employer to active members of the system and to members who are retired from the plan and reemployed under AS

14.20.136

, including any adjustments to contributions required by AS

14.25.173(a)

.

The employer shall transmit the contributions calculated in (a) of this section to the administrator in accordance with AS

14.25.065

. The administrator shall allocate contributions received for full payment of

the actuarially determined employer normal cost for the plan; and

all contributions required by AS

14.25.350

and AS

39.30.370

for the fiscal year.

If, after allocation of contributions under (b) of this section, a portion of the employer contributions remains, the administrator shall apply that remaining portion toward payment of the past service liability of the plan.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, the annual employer contribution rate may not be less than the rate sufficient to allow payment of the employer normal cost and the employer contributions required under AS

14.25.350

and AS

39.30.370

.

[Repealed, §§ 83, 84, and 86, ch. 41, SLA 2009.]

All or a portion of the employer’s share of any accrued actuarial liability to the plan may be prepaid in a lump sum. The commissioner of administration may, by regulation, establish a minimum amount for the lump sum payment of a portion. The administrator shall charge to the employer appropriate and reasonable administrative costs to the plan attributable to a lump sum payment that are not greater than administrative costs applied to other employer contributions. If an employer is grouped with any other employer in accounting for contributions, the lump sum payment for the employer shall be accounted for separately in accordance with regulations adopted by the commissioner. The regulations must provide for crediting to each lump sum payment account all earnings and losses received from investment of that payment. The lump sum payment shall be used solely to offset contributions under this section required of the employer for which the payment was made, taking into account earnings and losses from its investment. A lump sum payment made by or on behalf of an employer under this subsection, together with all earnings and losses from investment of that payment, may not be considered in calculating that employer’s share of any discretionary payment authorized by the state that benefits multiple employers.

If all or a portion of an employer’s share of any accrued actuarial liability to the plan is prepaid in a lump sum under (f) of this section, the administrator shall calculate a revised employer contribution rate for that employer in recognition of that prepayment not more than 30 days following the prepayment.

In this section, “normal cost” means the cost of providing the benefits expected to be credited, with respect to service, to all active members of the plan during the year beginning after the last valuation date.

History.

(§ 8 ch 145 SLA 1955; am § 5 ch 151 SLA 1966; am § 5 ch 138 SLA 1970; am § 5 ch 66 SLA 1973; am § 22 ch 91 SLA 1987; am § 11 ch 106 SLA 1988; am § 4 ch 59 SLA 2002; am § 6 ch 92 SLA 2004; am §§ 10, 11 ch 9 FSSLA 2005; am §§ 6, 12 ch 50 SLA 2005; am §§ 2, 3 ch 20 SLA 2007; am § 3 ch 13 SLA 2008; am § 1 ch 35 SLA 2008; am §§ 81, 83 ch 41 SLA 2009; am § 5 ch 81 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

Former subsection (c) was enacted as (b) and relettered in 2005, at which time “plan” was substituted for “system” in former subsection (c) in accordance with sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005. Subsections (f) and (g) were enacted as (d) and (e) and relettered in 2008, at which time an internal reference in (g) was conformed and subsection (h), which had been enacted as (f), was relettered.

Subsection (e) was repealed July 1, 2009, by § 83, ch. 41, SLA 2009.
Under § 84, ch. 41, SLA 2009, the repeal was contingent on the repeal of AS

14.20.135

under §§ 12 and 15, ch. 57, SLA 2001, as amended by § 6, ch. 15, SLA 2003, and by §§ 10 and 17, ch. 50, SLA 2005.
Under § 86, ch. 41, SLA 2009, the repeal took effect on the date of the repeal of AS

14.20.135

, which occurred on July 1, 2009.

Cross references. —

For provision providing that the 2018 amendment to subsection (a) “applies to contracts made on or after November 8, 2018”, see sec. 6, ch. 81, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective July 1, 2009, repealed subsection (e).

The 2018 amendment, effective November 8, 2018, in (a), added “and to members who are retired from the plan and reemployed under AS

14.20.136

” following “active members of the system”.